Utah statutes.
11-32-13.   Financing authority as public entity -- Liberal construction of chapter.

A financing authority is a public entity and an instrumentality of the state performing essential governmental functions on behalf of participant members. To better enable financing authorities to perform these functions, this chapter shall be liberally construed.



Enacted by Chapter 143, 1987 General Session

